Utah statutes.
57-18-5.   Termination.

A conservation easement may be terminated, in whole or in part, by release, abandonment, merger, nonrenewal, conditions set forth in the instrument creating the conservation easement, or in any other lawful manner in which easements may be terminated.



Enacted by Chapter 155, 1985 General Session

